Washington statutes.
RCW 9.100.050

Giving over inmate authorized.

It shall be lawful and mandatory upon the warden or other official in charge of a penal or correctional institution in this state to give over the person of any inmate thereof whenever so required by the operation of the agreement on detainers.

[ 1967 c 34 s 5.]